Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 11 Sales Off Premises for Catered Functions

Administrative rules and regulations.

Alcoholic beverage catering, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Subject 560-2-13.

3-11-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Food caterer” means any person who prepares food for consumption off the premises.

“Licensed alcoholic beverage caterer” means any retail dealer who has been licensed pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 4, Article 2 of Chapter 5, or Article 2 of Chapter 6 of this title.

“Person” means any individual, company, corporation, association, partnership, or other legal entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1145, § 1.

3-11-2.
Licensed alcoholic beverage caterers eligible for off-premise licenses; application; fee.

Any licensed alcoholic beverage caterer who additionally holds a valid license from a county or municipality which authorizes the licensee to sell malt beverages or wine by the drink for consumption on the premises may be issued from the same licensing authority an off-premise license which authorizes such licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to sell malt beverages or wine by the drink off premises and in connection with an authorized catered function.

Any licensed alcoholic beverage caterer who additionally holds a valid license from a county or municipality which authorizes the licensee to sell malt beverages or wine by the package for consumption off the premises may be issued from the same licensing authority an off-premise license which authorizes such licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to sell malt beverages or wine by the drink off premises and in connection with an authorized catered function.

Any licensed alcoholic beverage caterer who additionally holds a valid license from a county or municipality which authorizes the licensee to sell distilled spirits by the drink for consumption on the premises may be issued from the same licensing authority an off-premise license which authorizes such licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to sell distilled spirits by the drink off premises and in connection with an authorized catered function.

Any licensed alcoholic beverage caterer who additionally holds a valid license from a county or municipality which authorizes the licensee to sell distilled spirits by the package for consumption off the premises may be issued from the same licensing authority an off-premise license which authorizes such licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to sell distilled spirits by the drink off premises and in connection with an authorized catered function.

An alcoholic beverage caterer shall make application for an off-premise license as provided in subsections (a) and (c) or subsections (b) and (d) of this Code section with the appropriate local licensing authority and shall pay to the local licensing authority an annual license fee as fixed by the local licensing authority, provided that the total of such local license fees shall not exceed $5,000.00 for any one licensed location.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1145, § 1.

3-11-3.
Event permits.

In order to distribute or sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wine at an authorized catered function, a licensed alcoholic beverage caterer shall be required to:

Apply to the local governing authority of the jurisdiction where the function is to be catered for an event permit. The application shall include the name of the caterer; the date, address, and time of the event; and the licensed alcoholic beverage caterer’s license number. When the catered function is domiciled in a local political subdivision other than that which issues the alcoholic beverage caterer’s license, that local governing authority shall be authorized to charge an event permit fee of $50.00 and levy local excise taxes on the total quantity of alcoholic beverages brought into such political subdivision by the caterer;

Provide satisfactory reports to the commissioner on forms provided by the department stating the quantity of any and all alcoholic beverages transported from the licensee’s primary premises to the location of the authorized catered function and such other information as required by the commissioner; and

Maintain original local event permits and documents required by the department in the vehicle transporting the alcoholic beverages to the catered function at all times.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1145, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “licensee’s” was substituted for “licensees” in paragraph (2).

3-11-4.
Violations.

It shall be unlawful for a food caterer to distribute or sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wine off the premises of the food caterer’s business without a license issued pursuant to this chapter. This subsection shall not affect any other provisions of this title which may require a food caterer who has a license to sell alcoholic beverages on the premises of the food caterer’s business.

It shall be unlawful for a licensed alcoholic beverage caterer licensed under this chapter to distribute or sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wine off premises except in connection with an authorized catered function within the scope of the event permit.

It shall be unlawful for a licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to distribute or sell distilled spirits in any jurisdiction which does not permit the sale of distilled spirits by the drink for consumption only on the premises.

It shall be unlawful for a licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to distribute or sell malt beverages or wine in any jurisdiction which does not permit the sale of malt beverages or wine by the drink for consumption only on the premises.

It shall be unlawful for a licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to distribute or sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wine during any hours in which the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink for consumption only on the premises is not permitted in the jurisdiction.

It shall be unlawful for a licensed alcoholic beverage caterer to employ any person under 21 years of age who, in the course of such employment, would dispense, serve, sell, or handle alcoholic beverages. It is the intent of this subsection to prevent any person employed by such caterer, or any other employee, to knowingly violate any prohibitions contained in Code Section 3-3-23, relating to furnishing alcoholic beverages to, and purchase and possession of alcoholic beverages by, a person under 21 years of age.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages by a caterer in any jurisdiction where the sale of distilled spirits by the drink for consumption only on the premises has not been legalized.

Any person violating the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1145, § 1.

3-11-5.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement and carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1145, § 1.